District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-342

Unauthorized entry onto Stadium playing field prohibited.

Repealed.

History

Nov. 3, 1977, D.C. Law 2-37, § 3, 24 DCR 4058
Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 21(b), 41 DCR 4636

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-342.
1973 Ed., § 2-1742.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3 of Omnibus Sports Consolidation Act of 1994 Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-67, October 26, 1995, law notification 42 DCR ).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition (90 days) of section, see § 3 of the Omnibus Sports Consolidation Act of 1994 Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-102, July 21, 1995, 42 DCR 4009).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(a) of Ballpark Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-316, March 19, 2008, 55 DCR 3412).